Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1305
Existing shooting range; effect of
noise provisions.

Any shooting range that is existing and lawful may continue
to operate as a shooting range notwithstanding, and without regard to, any
law, rule, regulation, ordinance, or resolution related to noise enacted thereafter
by any city, county, village, or other political subdivision of the state,
except as provided in section 37-1308, if operated in compliance with the
shooting range performance standards.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 5.